dev/shupashkar/apertium-tt-ru.tt.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<sg%>  ! Единственное число
%<pl%>  ! Множественное число
%<nom%> ! Основной падеж
%<gen%> ! Притяжательный падеж
%<dir%> ! Направительный падеж
%<acc%> ! Винительный падеж
%<ish%> ! исходный падеж
%<mest%> ! Местно-временной падеж
%<pxsg1%> ! Притяжательность ед.ч. 1 лицо
%<pxsg2%> ! Притяжательность ед.ч. 2 лицо
%<pxsg3%> ! Притяжательность ед.ч. 3 лицо
%<pxpl1%> ! Притяжательность мн.ч. 1 лицо
%<pxpl2%> ! Притяжательность мн.ч. 2 лицо
%<pxpl3%> ! приятжательность мн.ч. 3 лицо
%{А%} ! Гласный 'а' или 'ә'
%{Е%} ! Гласный 'ы' или 'е'
%{Г%} ! Согласный 'г' или 'к'
%{Д%} ! Согласный 'д' или 'т'
%{Н%} ! Согласный 'н' или 'т'
%<adj%> ! Имя прилагательное
%<conjoo%> ! Союз
%<adv%> ! Наречие
%<prn_pers%> ! Личные местоимения
%<vvod%> ! Вводное слово
%<comma%> ! Запятая
%<prn_ques%> ! Вопросительные местоимения
%<poslelog%> ! Послелоги
%<num%> ! Имя числительное
%<prn_dir%> ! Указательные местоимения
%<ant%>
%<np%>
%<m%>
%<f%>


! Tense, aspect, mood
%<imp%>            ! Imperative
%<cond%>           ! Conditional  ! Шарт  ! Условное  ! -с{A}
%<caus%>           ! Causative
%<pass%>           ! Passive
%<coop%>           ! Cooperative
%<neg%>            ! Negative
%<pres%>           ! -{A}
%<past%>           ! -{G}{A}н 
%<fut%>            ! -{I}р
%<ifi%>            ! -{D}{I} 
%<ger1%>           ! -м{A}{K}
%<ger2%>           ! -{I}п
%<ger3%>           ! -{G}{A}ч
%<ger4%>           ! -{G}{A}нч{I}
%<ger5%>           ! -{G}{A}н
%<ger6%>           ! -{I}р / -{A}р
%<ger7%>           ! -{A}ч{A}к
%<ger8%>           ! -{E}с
%<prn_otnos%>      ! 

! Transitivity ! Переходность
%<tv%>             ! Transitive
%<iv%>             ! Intransitive

! Зат ! Лицо
%<p1%>             !
%<p2%>             !
%<p3%>             !

%<vaux%>           ! Auxilary verb

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 
Adjectives ;
Conjunctions ;
Adverbs ;
Pronouns_Pers ;
Verbs ;
Vvodnoe_slovo ;
Punct ;
Pronouns_Quest ;
Poslelogi ;
Numbers ;
Pronouns_Dir ;

LEXICON CLIT
# ; ! For clitics, if they exist.

LEXICON POSS
# ; !! NB! This is not defined.

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2
!! кыска төрләнеш
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;

V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S4 ! Volition endings

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-FUT-IR

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{I%}р POSS ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{I%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FUT-AR

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{A%}р POSS ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{A%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-FORMS

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-S1 ; 
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S3 ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON-LEX

V-FINITE-FORMS ; 

%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} POSS ; 
%<ger2%>:%>%{I%}п POSS ; 
%<ger3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}ч POSS ; 
%<ger4%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{I%} POSS ; 
%<ger5%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSS ;
%<ger7%>:%>%{A%}ч%{A%}к POSS ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{E%}с V-PERS-S4 ;
%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;

LEXICON V-NEG

%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 

V-COMMON-LEX ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG ;

V-NEG ;

LEXICON V-IV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-IR ; 

LEXICON V-IV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-AR ; 

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-S2 ;


LEXICON PRN_PERS

%<prn_pers%>: # ;

LEXICON CHISL

%<num%>: PX ;

LEXICON Pron-Otnositelnyj

%<prn_otnos%>: PX ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ;
%<gen%>:%>н%{Е%}ң # ;
%<dir%>:%>%{Г%}%{А%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>н # ;
%<ish%>:%>%{Н%}%{А%}н # ;
%<mest%>:%>%{Д%}%{А%} # ;

LEXICON PX
CASE ;
%<pxsg1%>:%>%{Е%}м CASE;
%<pxsg2%>:%>%{Е%}ң CASE;
%<pxsg3%>:%>%{Е%} CASE;
%<pxpl1%>:%>%{Е%}б%{Е%}з CASE;
%<pxpl2%>:%>%{Е%}г%{Е%}з CASE;
%<pxpl3%>:%>л%{А%}р%{Е%} CASE;

LEXICON NUM

%<sg%>: PX ;
%<pl%>:%>л%{А%}р PX ;

LEXICON ADV
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJOO

%<conjoo%>: # ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: NUM ;

LEXICON PRON_D

%<prn_dir%>: CASE ;

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: NUM ;

LEXICON POSL

%<poslelog%>: 



LEXICON VV

!%<vvod%>:%>%<comma%> ; ! Probably not intended.
%<vvod%>: # ; ! Perhaps this was intended?

LEXICON Punct
,%<comma%>:, # ;

LEXICON PRON_Q
%<prn_ques%>: # ;

LEXICON Pronouns_Quest
кайда PRON_Q ;
ни өчен PRON_Q ;
ни PRON_Q ;
кая PRON_Q ;

LEXICON NP-Ant-M-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASE ;

LEXICON NP-Ant-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ;

LEXICON Nouns

эт N1 ; ! ""
Һава N1 ; ! ""
бакча N1 ; ! ""
малай N1 ; ! ""
әни N1 ; ! ""
сеңел N1 ; ! ""
бала N1 ; ! ""
өй N1 ; ! ""
песи N1 ; ! ""
тәрәзә N1 ; ! ""
агач N1 ; ! ""
күз N1 ; ! ""
кул N1 ; ! ""
уен N1 ; ! ""
җавап N1 ; ! ""
сорау N1 ; ! ""
кеше N1 ; ! ""
Өстәл N1 ; ! ""
утыргыч N1 ; ! ""
тавыш N1 ; ! ""
кош N1 ; ! ""
хайван N1 ; ! ""
баш N1 ; ! ""
су N1 ; ! ""
кызыкай N1 ; ! ""
тыш N1 ; ! ""
игътибар N1 ; ! ""
нәрсә N1 ; ! "вещь"
урын N1 ; ! ""
яшь N1 ; ! ""
вакыт N1 ; ! ""


LEXICON Adjectives

әйбәт A1 ; ! ""
бәләкәй A1 ; ! ""
шат A1 ; ! ""
зур A1 ; ! ""
иске A1 ; ! ""

LEXICON Conjunctions
һәм CONJOO ;
тик CONJOO ;
әмма CONJOO ;
вә CONJOO ; ! ""
ә CONJOO ; ! ""
да CONJOO ; ! ""


LEXICON Adverbs
кичә ADV ;
бик ADV ;
суык ADV ;
бүген ADV ;
җылы ADV ;
гына ADV ;
һәрвакыт ADV ;
бергә ADV ;
соңрак ADV ;
яхшы ADV ;
якынрак ADV ;
анда ADV ;
әлегә ADV ;
карап ADV ;
тиз ADV ;
шуннан ADV ;
тагын ADV ;
хәзер ADV ;


LEXICON Pronouns_Pers

мин%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:мин # ;
мин%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:минем # ;
мин%<prn_pers%>%<dir%>:миңа # ;
мин%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:мине # ;
мин%<prn_pers%>%<ish%>:миннән # ;
мин%<prn_pers%>%<mest%>:миндә # ;

ул%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:ул # ;
ул%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:аның # ;
ул%<prn_pers%>%<dir%>:аңа # ;
ул%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:аны # ;
ул%<prn_pers%>%<ish%>:аннан # ;
ул%<prn_pers%>%<mest%>:анда # ;

син%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:син # ;
син%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:синең # ;
син%<prn_pers%>%<dir%>:сиңа # ;
син%<prn_pers%>%<ish%>:синнән # ;
син%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:сине # ;
син%<prn_pers%>%<mest%>:синдә # ;

алар%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:алар # ;
алар%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:аларнең # ;
алар%<prn_pers%>%<dir%>:аларгә # ;
алар%<prn_pers%>%<ish%>:алардән # ;
алар%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:аларне # ;
алар%<prn_pers%>%<mest%>:алардә # ;

нәрсә Pron-Otnositelnyj ; ! "вещь"

LEXICON Verbs

бар:бар V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кил:кил V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
утыр:утыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
йокла:йокла V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күзәт:күзәт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
уйна:уйна V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
йөгер:йөгер V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
эшлә:эшлә V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кара:кара V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
эзлә:эзлә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сора:сора V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
җавап% бир:җавап% бир V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
әйт:әйт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
йөр:йөр V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
табарга
тырыш:тырыш V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ишет:ишет V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ашарга
алырга
күрен:күрен V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сөйләш:сөйләш V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күр: V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ал:ал V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ярат:ярат V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
эч:эч V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Vvodnoe_slovo
юк VV ; ! ""
әлбәттә VV ; ! ""
ди VV ; ! ""

LEXICON Poslelogi
алдындагы POSL ; ! ""
артыннан POSL ; ! ""
белән POSL ; ! ""
астында POSL ; ! ""
сәбәпле POSL ; ! ""

LEXICON Numbers
алты CHISL ; ! ""
бер CHISL ; ! ""
биш CHISL ; ! ""
ике CHISL ; ! ""
берәр CHISL ; ! ""

LEXICON Pronouns_Dir
шул PRON_D ; ! ""
бу PRON_D ; ! ""

LEXICON Imena

Гөлнара NP-Ant-F ; ! ""
Әхмәт NP-Ant-M-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ; ! ""
